Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5949.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 221. (1) The secretary of state shall create and maintain a computerized central file of all applications for registration of motor vehicles and is not required to retain any other record of the application. The computerized central file must be interfaced with the law enforcement information network as provided in the C.J.I.S. policy council act, 1974 PA 163, MCL 28.211 to 28.215. (2) The secretary of state shall preserve the records described in subsection (1) for 3 years after the date of registration. The records must be available to state and federal agencies and the friend of the court as provided under section 4 of the C.J.I.S. policy council act, 1974 PA 163, MCL 28.214, and rules promulgated under that section. The records, except for a communication impediment designation, must be available to the public through the secretary of state's commercial look-up service. (3) If an owner of a motor vehicle meets the requirements under subsection (4), the secretary of state shall allow the owner of a motor vehicle who is applying for a vehicle registration or for renewal of a vehicle registration to elect a communication impediment designation on the application maintained in the central file under subsection (1) to allow a person with access to the law enforcement information network under the C.J.I.S. policy council act, 1974 PA 163, MCL 28.211 to 28.215, to view a communication impediment designation with a motor vehicle registration. (4) An owner of a motor vehicle seeking an election for a communication impediment designation under subsection (3) shall provide to the secretary of state a certification that meets all of the following: (a) Is signed by a physician, physician assistant, certified nurse practitioner, audiologist, speech-language pathologist, psychologist, or physical therapist licensed to practice in this state. (b) Identifies the individual for whom the communication impediment designation is being elected. (c) Attests to the nature of the communication impediment. (5) A person who intentionally makes a false statement of material fact or commits or attempts to commit a deception or fraud on a statement described under subsection (4) is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 30 days or a fine of not more than $500.00, or both. (6) Subject to subsection (7), the secretary of state may cancel or revoke a communication impediment designation elected and maintained under this section if either of the following circumstances applies: (a) The secretary of state determines that a communication impediment designation was fraudulently or erroneously elected. (b) The secretary of state determines the communication impediment designation was abused during a traffic stop. (7) The secretary of state shall provide the owner of a motor vehicle notice and an opportunity to be heard before canceling or revoking a communication impediment designation under subsection (6). (8) As used in this section, "communication impediment" means the owner of a motor vehicle, or an individual who resides in the same owner's household, as the owner of the motor vehicle, or the owner of the motor vehicle is the parent or legal guardian of an individual that has a health condition that may impede communication with a police officer during a traffic stop, including, but not limited to, any of the following: (a) Deafness or hearing loss. (b) An autism spectrum disorder. Sec. 221a. (1) Beginning 90 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, the secretary of state shall create a communication impediment decal for individuals with a communication impediment. The communication impediment decal must be designed so that it can be placed in the windshield of a vehicle without obstructing the driver's vision or on a registration plate issued by this state. The communication decal must be issued to individuals with a communication impediment at no cost. (2) An individual who has a communication impediment may apply to the secretary of state for a communication impediment decal to be placed on the individual's vehicle or registration plate. An individual shall apply for the communication impediment decal in a form and manner as prescribed by the secretary of state and shall provide the secretary of state a certification that meets the requirements of section 221(4) with the application. (3) As used in this section, "communication impediment" means that term as defined in sections 221 and 310. Sec. 310. (1) The secretary of state shall issue an operator's license to each person licensed as an operator and a chauffeur's license to each person licensed as a chauffeur. An applicant for a motorcycle indorsement endorsement under section 312a or a vehicle group designation or indorsement endorsement shall first qualify for an operator's or chauffeur's license before the indorsement endorsement or vehicle group designation application is accepted and processed. An original license or the first renewal of an existing license issued to a person less younger than 21 years of age must be portrait or vertical in form and a license issued to a person 21 years of age or over older must be landscape or horizontal in form. (2) The license issued under subsection (1) must contain all of the following: (a) The distinguishing number permanently assigned to the licensee. (b) Except as provided in section 310f, the full legal name, date of birth, address of residence, height, eye color, sex, digital photographic image, expiration date, and signature of the licensee. (c) In the case of a licensee who has indicated his or her the licensee's wish to participate in the anatomical gift donor registry under part 101 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.10101 to 333.10123, a heart insignia on the front of the license. (d) Physical security features designed to prevent tampering, counterfeiting, or duplication of the license for fraudulent purposes. (e) If requested by an individual who is a veteran of the armed forces of this state, another state, or the United States, a designation that the individual is a veteran. The designation must be in a style and format considered appropriate by the secretary of state. The secretary of state shall require proof of discharge or separation of service from the armed forces of this state, another state, or the United States, and the nature of that discharge, for the purposes of verifying an individual's status as a veteran under this subdivision. The secretary of state shall consult with the department of military and veterans affairs in determining the proof that must be required to identify an individual's status as a veteran for the purposes of this subsection. The secretary of state may provide the department of military and veterans affairs and agencies of the counties of this state that provide veteran services with information provided by an applicant under this subsection for the purpose of veterans' benefits eligibility referral. (3) Except as otherwise required under this chapter, other information required on the license under this chapter may appear on the license in a form prescribed by the secretary of state. (4) The license must not contain a fingerprint or finger image of the licensee. (5) A digitized license may contain an identifier for voter registration purposes. The digitized license may contain information appearing in electronic or machine-readable codes needed to conduct a transaction with the secretary of state. The information must be limited to the information described in subsection (2)(a) and (b) except for the person's digital photographic image and signature, state of issuance, license expiration date, and other information necessary for use with electronic devices, machine readers, or automatic teller machines and must not contain the driving record or other personal identifier. The license must identify the encoded information. (6) The license must be manufactured in a manner to prohibit as nearly as possible the ability to reproduce, alter, counterfeit, forge, or duplicate the license without ready detection. In addition, a license with a vehicle group designation must contain the information required under 49 CFR part 383. (7) Except as provided in subsection (11), a person who intentionally reproduces, alters, counterfeits, forges, or duplicates a license photograph, the negative of the photograph, image, license, or electronic data contained on a license or a part of a license or who uses a license, image, or photograph that has been reproduced, altered, counterfeited, forged, or duplicated is subject to 1 of the following: (a) If the intent of the reproduction, alteration, counterfeiting, forging, duplication, or use is to commit or aid in the commission of an offense that is a felony punishable by imprisonment for 10 or more years, the person committing the reproduction, alteration, counterfeiting, forging, duplication, or use is guilty of a felony, punishable by imprisonment for not more than 10 years or a fine of not more than $20,000.00, or both. (b) If the intent of the reproduction, alteration, counterfeiting, forging, duplication, or use is to commit or aid in the commission of an offense that is a felony punishable by imprisonment for less than 10 years or a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for 6 months or more, the person committing the reproduction, alteration, counterfeiting, forging, duplication, or use is guilty of a felony, punishable by imprisonment for not more than 5 years, or a fine of not more than $10,000.00, or both. (c) If the intent of the reproduction, alteration, counterfeiting, forging, duplication, or use is to commit or aid in the commission of an offense that is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for less than 6 months, the person committing the reproduction, alteration, counterfeiting, forging, duplication, or use is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 1 year or a fine of not more than $2,000.00, or both. (8) Except as provided in subsections (11) and (16), a person who sells, or who possesses with the intent to deliver to another, a reproduced, altered, counterfeited, forged, or duplicated license photograph, negative of the photograph, image, license, or electronic data contained on a license or part of a license is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 5 years or a fine of not more than $10,000.00, or both. (9) Except as provided in subsections (11) and (16), a person who is in possession of 2 or more reproduced, altered, counterfeited, forged, or duplicated license photographs, negatives of the photograph, images, licenses, or electronic data contained on a license or part of a license is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 5 years or a fine of not more than $10,000.00, or both. (10) Except as provided in subsection (16), a person who is in possession of a reproduced, altered, counterfeited, forged, or duplicated license photograph, negative of the photograph, image, license, or electronic data contained on a license or part of a license is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 1 year or a fine of not more than $2,000.00, or both. (11) Subsections (7)(a) and (b), (8), and (9) do not apply to a minor whose intent is to violate section 703 of the Michigan liquor control code of 1998, 1998 PA 58, MCL 436.1703. (12) The secretary of state, upon on determining after an examination that an applicant is mentally and physically qualified to receive a license, may issue the applicant a temporary driver's permit. The temporary driver's permit entitles the applicant, while having the permit in his or her the applicant's immediate possession, to operate a motor vehicle upon the highway for a period not exceeding 60 days before the secretary of state has issued the applicant an operator's or chauffeur's license. The secretary of state may establish a longer duration for the validity of a temporary driver's permit if necessary to accommodate the process of obtaining a background check that is required for an applicant by federal law. (13) An operator or chauffeur may indicate on the license in a place designated by the secretary of state his or her the operator's or chauffeur's blood type, emergency contact information, immunization data, medication data, or a statement that the licensee is deaf. The secretary of state shall not require an applicant for an original or renewal operator's or chauffeur's license to provide emergency contact information as a condition of obtaining a license. However, the secretary of state may inquire whether an operator or chauffeur would like to provide emergency contact information and , beginning July 1, 2021, shall allow an operator or chauffeur that meets the requirements of subsection (21) to elect a communication impediment designation. Emergency contact information obtained under this subsection must be disclosed only to a state or federal law enforcement agency for law enforcement purposes or to the extent necessary for a medical emergency. The secretary of state shall develop and shall, in conjunction with the department of state police, implement a process using the L.E.I.N. or any other appropriate system that limits access to law enforcement that would allow law enforcement agencies of this state to access emergency contact information and , beginning July 1, 2021, to view a communication impediment designation that the holder of an operator's license has voluntarily provided to the secretary of state. (14) An operator or chauffeur may indicate on the license in a place designated by the secretary of state that he or she the operator or chauffeur has designated a patient advocate in accordance with sections 5506 to 5515 of the estates and protected individuals code, 1998 PA 386, MCL 700.5506 to 700.5515. (15) If the applicant provides proof to the secretary of state that he or she the applicant is a minor who has been emancipated under 1968 PA 293, MCL 722.1 to 722.6, the license must bear the designation of the individual's emancipated status in a manner prescribed by the secretary of state. (16) Subsections (8), (9), and (10) do not apply to a person who is in possession of 1 or more photocopies, reproductions, or duplications of a license to document the identity of the licensee for a legitimate business purpose. (17) A sticker or decal may be provided by any person, hospital, school, medical group, or association interested in assisting in implementing an emergency medical information card, but must meet the specifications of the secretary of state. An emergency medical information card may contain information concerning the licensee's patient advocate designation, other emergency medical information, or an indication as to where the licensee has stored or registered emergency medical information. (18) The secretary of state shall inquire of each licensee, in person or by mail, whether the licensee agrees to participate in the anatomical gift donor registry under part 101 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.10101 to 333.10123. (19) A licensee who has agreed to participate in the anatomical gift donor registry under part 101 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.10101 to 333.10123, must not be considered to have revoked that agreement solely because the licensee's license has been revoked or suspended or has expired. Enrollment in the donor registry constitutes a legal agreement that remains binding and in effect after the donor's death regardless of the expressed desires of the deceased donor's next of kin who may oppose the donor's anatomical gift. (20) If an operator's or chauffeur's license is issued to an individual described in section 307(1)(b) who has temporary lawful status, the license must be issued in compliance with 6 CFR 37.21 or in compliance with the process established to comply with 6 CFR 37.71 by the secretary of state. (21) An operator or chauffeur seeking an election for a communication impediment designation under subsection (13) shall provide to the secretary of state a certification that meets all of the following: (a) Is signed by a physician, physician assistant, certified nurse practitioner, audiologist, speech-language pathologist, psychologist, or physical therapist licensed to practice in this state. (b) Identifies the individual for whom the communication impediment designation is being elected. (c) Attests to the nature of the communication impediment. (22) A person who intentionally makes a false statement of material fact or commits or attempts to commit a deception or fraud on a statement described under subsection (21) is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 30 days or a fine of not more than $500.00, or both. (23) Subject to subsection (24), the secretary of state may cancel or revoke a communication impediment designation elected and maintained under this section if either of the following circumstances applies: (a) The secretary of state determines that a communication impediment designation was fraudulently or erroneously elected. (b) The secretary of state determines the communication impediment designation was abused during a traffic stop. (24) The secretary of state shall provide the operator or chauffeur notice and an opportunity to be heard before canceling or revoking a communication impediment designation under subsection (23). (25) As used in this section: (a) "Communication impediment" means the operator or chauffeur an applicant, an individual who lives in the applicant's household, or an applicant who is the parent or legal guardian of an individual who has a health condition that may impede communication with a police officer during a traffic stop, including, but not limited to, any of the following: (i) Deafness or hearing loss. (ii) An autism spectrum disorder. (b) "Emergency contact information" means the name, telephone number, or address of an individual that is used for the sole purpose of contacting that individual when the holder of an operator's license has been involved in an emergency. (c) "Temporary lawful status" means that term as defined in 6 CFR 37.3. (d) "Veteran" means that term as defined in section 1 of 1965 PA 190, MCL 35.61. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5950 (request no. H06958'26) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.